New Jersey, session 222, S288.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2009, c.224 (C.39:2A-42) is amended to read as follows: 2. a. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, no later than six months [from the date of enactment of this act] following the effective date of P.L.    , c.      (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and [periodically] every three years thereafter, the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall establish promotional payment incentives and shall offer such incentives to any driver who has failed to pay any motor vehicle surcharges levied pursuant to paragraph (1) or paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.65 (C.17:29A-35) or who has been authorized by the chief administrator to pay a surcharge levied pursuant to paragraph (1) or paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.65 (C.17:29A-35) on an installment basis.  The promotional payment incentives afforded under this subsection shall not apply to surcharges levied pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.1983, c.65 (C.17:29A-35) nor shall any driver who has any outstanding surcharges levied pursuant to that paragraph be eligible to participate in any promotional payment incentives established by the chief administrator. Promotional payment incentives may include, but need not be limited to, waivers of down payments necessary to satisfy any surcharge suspension, waivers of interest for the payment of the full principal amount of any surcharges owed to the chief administrator, or any other incentive that the chief administrator establishes. b.    All monies collected pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be remitted to the "Motor Vehicle Surcharges Revenue Fund," established pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2004, c.70 (C.34:1B-21.28). (cf:  P.L.2009, c.224, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately, but the Chief Administrator of the Motor Vehicle Commission may take any administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.